Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB558.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 164.7881 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Eligible high school students who have graduated from high school and eligible
postsecondary students who have earned a Kentucky educational excellence
scholarship, a Kentucky educational excellence scholarship and a supplemental
award, or a supplemental award only pursuant to KRS 164.7879(3)(e), shall be
eligible to receive the Kentucky educational excellence scholarship, the Kentucky
educational excellence scholarship and the supplemental award, or a supplemental
award only for a maximum of eight (8) academic terms in an undergraduate or other
postsecondary program of study at a participating institution, except as provided in
subsections (5) and (6) of this section.
(2) To receive the Kentucky educational excellence scholarship, a Kentucky
educational excellence scholarship and supplemental award, or a supplemental
award only, an eligible high school or postsecondary student shall:
(a) Enroll in and attend a participating institution as a full-time student or a part-
time student; and
(b) Maintain eligibility as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) Eligibility for a Kentucky educational excellence scholarship or a Kentucky
educational excellence scholarship and supplemental award shall terminate upon
the earlier of:
(a) The expiration of eight (8)[five (5)] years following the student's graduation
from high school, except as provided in subsection (5) or (6) of this section;
or
(b) The successful completion of an undergraduate or other postsecondary course
of study. However, any student who successfully completes the requirements
for a degree or certification involving a postsecondary course of study that
Page 1 of 9
XXXX 1/3/2025 8:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 848
normally requires less than eight (8) academic terms to complete may
continue to receive the benefits of a Kentucky educational excellence
scholarship, a Kentucky educational excellence scholarship and supplemental
award, or a supplemental award only, for a cumulative total of eight (8)
academic terms if the student enrolls as at least a part-time student in a four
(4) year program.
(4) (a) The maximum award amount shall be determined by the authority and shall
be adjusted as provided in this subsection. The award amount ultimately
determined to be available to an eligible postsecondary student for an award
period shall be delivered by the authority to the participating institution for
disbursement to the eligible postsecondary student.
(b) The authority shall, by promulgation of administrative regulations, provide for
the proportionate reduction of the maximum award amount for an eligible
postsecondary student for any academic term in which the student is enrolled
on a part-time basis. Each academic term for which any scholarship or
supplemental award funds are accepted by an eligible postsecondary student
shall count as a full academic term, even if the award amount was reduced to
reflect the part-time status of the eligible postsecondary student, except if the
eligible postsecondary student interrupts enrollment during the award period
for any reason specified in subsection (5) of this section, and the participating
institution does not certify a cumulative grade point average for that student at
the end of that award period.
(c) 1. An eligible postsecondary student who is enrolled full-time in an
undergraduate program of study, in the pharmacy program at the
University of Kentucky, or in a program of study designated as an
equivalent undergraduate program of study by the authority in an
administrative regulation, shall receive the maximum award amount for
Page 2 of 9
XXXX 1/3/2025 8:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 848
the first award period that the student is enrolled in and attending the
program of study.
2. To retain the maximum award for the second award period, an eligible
postsecondary student shall have at least a 2.5 grade point average at the
end of the first award period. If the eligible postsecondary student
interrupts enrollment during the award period for any reason specified in
subsection (5) of this section, and the participating institution does not
certify a cumulative grade point average for that student at the end of
that award period, the eligible postsecondary student shall, subject to
paragraph (b) of this subsection, retain the maximum award for the
award period in which he or she resumes enrollment.
3. To retain the maximum award amount for subsequent award periods, an
eligible postsecondary student shall have:
a. A cumulative grade point average of 3.0 or greater at the end of
the prior award period. If the eligible postsecondary student
interrupts enrollment during the award period for any reason
specified in subsection (5) of this section, and the participating
institution does not certify a cumulative grade point average for
that student at the end of that award period, the eligible
postsecondary student shall, subject to paragraph (b) of this
subsection, retain the same award for the award period in which he
or she resumes enrollment as he or she received in the award
period in which enrollment was interrupted; or
b. A cumulative grade point average of 2.5 or greater but less than
3.0 at the end of the prior award period and be on track to
graduate. If the eligible postsecondary student interrupts
enrollment during the award period for any reason specified in
Page 3 of 9
XXXX 1/3/2025 8:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 848
subsection (5) of this section, and the participating institution does
not certify a cumulative grade point average for that student at the
end of that award period, the eligible postsecondary student shall,
subject to paragraph (b) of this subsection, retain the same award
for the award period in which he or she resumes enrollment as he
or she received in the award period in which enrollment was
interrupted.
4. Any eligible full-time postsecondary student who maintains a
cumulative grade point average of less than 3.0 but at least 2.5 but is not
on track to graduate at the completion of any award period shall receive
a reduction in the maximum award amount equal to fifty percent (50%)
of the maximum award amount for the next award period.
5. Any eligible postsecondary student who maintains a cumulative grade
point average of less than 2.5 at the completion of any award period
shall lose his or her award for the next award period.
6. a. Each participating institution shall certify to the authority at the
close of each award period the cumulative grade point average of
each Kentucky educational excellence scholarship recipient
enrolled as a full-time or part-time student at the participating
institution.
b. In addition to reporting the grade point average, beginning with
the 2010-2011 academic year, each participating institution shall
certify to the authority at the close of each award period whether a
Kentucky educational excellence scholarship recipient who
initially enrolled in college in 2009-2010 or thereafter is on track
to graduate.
7. Any student who loses eligibility through failure to maintain the
Page 4 of 9
XXXX 1/3/2025 8:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 848
required cumulative grade point average may regain eligibility in a
subsequent award period upon reestablishing at least a 2.5 cumulative
grade point average or its equivalent during a subsequent award period,
as certified by the participating institution.
(5) The expiration of a student's eight (8) academic terms and eight (8)[five (5)] year
eligibility shall be extended by the authority upon a determination that the student
was unable to enroll for or complete an academic term due to any of the following
circumstances:
(a) A serious and extended illness or injury of the student, certified by an
attending physician;
(b) The death or serious and extended illness or injury of an immediate family
member of the student, certified by an attending physician, which would
render the student unable to attend classes;
(c) Natural disasters that would render a student unable to attend classes; or
(d) 1. Active duty status for the student in the United States Armed Forces or
as an officer in the Commissioned Corps of the United States Public
Health Service, or active service by the student in the Peace Corps Act
or the Americorps, for the total number of years during which the
student was on active duty status. The number of months served on
active duty status shall be rounded up to the next higher year to
determine the maximum length of eligibility extension allowed.
2. A student whose eligibility expired prior to July 15, 2008, due to the
three (3) year time limit on eligibility extensions imposed by this
paragraph prior to July 15, 2008, shall have his or her eligibility
reinstated for the number of years beyond the three (3) years during
which he or she was on active duty status. The number of months served
on active duty status shall be rounded up to the next higher year to
Page 5 of 9
XXXX 1/3/2025 8:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 848
determine the maximum length of eligibility extension allowed.
(6) An eligible postsecondary student who is enrolled at a participating institution in a
five (5) year undergraduate degree program designated in an administrative
regulation promulgated by the authority shall be eligible to receive the Kentucky
educational excellence scholarship, the Kentucky educational excellence
scholarship and the supplemental award, or the supplemental award only for a
maximum of ten (10) academic terms.[ The expiration of an eligible postsecondary
student's five (5) year eligibility shall be extended to six (6) years for eligible
postsecondary students meeting the requirements of this subsection.]
(7) Each participating institution shall notify its students of their terms of eligibility.
(8) Each eligible high school student who attains a 28 or above on the ACT and a 4.0
grade point average for all four (4) years of high school shall be designated as a
"Senator Jeff Green Scholar" in honor of the late Senator Jeff Green of Mayfield,
Kentucky, First District, and shall be recognized by the high school in a manner
consistent with recognition given by the high school to other high levels of
academic achievement.
Section 2. KRS 164.7884 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Academic year" means July 1 through June 30 of each year;
(b) "Apprentice" has the same meaning as in KRS 343.010;
(c) "Approved workforce solutions training program" means a local high-demand
work sector training program that is approved by the authority and is offered
by the Kentucky Community and Technical College System through
consultation with representatives of the local workforce development area and
the local Kentucky Community and Technical College System campus where
the program will be offered;
(d) "Eligible college of art and design" means a college that:
Page 6 of 9
XXXX 1/3/2025 8:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 848
1. Qualifies as a tax exempt organization pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of
the Internal Revenue Code:
2. Is conditionally or unconditionally licensed by the Council on
Postsecondary Education;
3. Is a candidate for accreditation by a regional accrediting association
recognized by the United States Department of Education;
4. Has its main campus physically located in Kentucky;
5. Limits its degree program offerings to the area of fine arts; and
6. Does not qualify as a participating institution as defined in KRS
164.7874;
(e) "Eligible student" means an eligible high school student who has graduated
from high school or a student eligible under KRS 164.7879(3)(e);
(f) "Proprietary school" means a school that:
1. Is licensed by the Kentucky Commission on Proprietary Education;
2. Has operated for at least five (5) years;
3. Has its headquarters or main campus physically located in Kentucky;
and
4. Does not qualify as a participating institution under KRS 164.7874(20);
(g) "Qualified proprietary school program" means a program offered by a
proprietary school that is in the field of agriculture as defined in KRS 246.010
or is in one (1) of Kentucky's top five (5) high-demand work sectors as
determined by the Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board;
(h) "Qualified workforce training program" means a program that is in one (1) of
Kentucky's top five (5) high-demand work sectors as determined by the
Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board;
(i) "Registered apprenticeship program" means an apprenticeship program that:
1. Is established in accordance with the requirements of KRS Chapter 343;
Page 7 of 9
XXXX 1/3/2025 8:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 848
2. Requires a minimum of two thousand (2,000) hours of on-the-job work
experience;
3. Requires a minimum of one hundred forty-four (144) hours of related
instruction for each year of the apprenticeship; and
4. Is approved by the Education and Labor Cabinet;
(j) "Related instruction" has the same meaning as in KRS 343.010; and
(k) "Sponsor" has the same meaning as in KRS 343.010.
(2) Notwithstanding KRS 164.7881, an eligible student who earned a KEES award
shall be eligible for a Kentucky educational excellence scholarship if the student
meets the requirements of this section and is:
(a) An apprentice in a registered apprenticeship program;
(b) Enrolled in a qualified workforce training program that has a current
articulation agreement for postsecondary credit hours with a participating
institution;
(c) Enrolled in a qualified proprietary school program;
(d) Enrolled in an approved workforce solutions training program; or
(e) Enrolled in an eligible college of art and design.
(3) (a) Beginning with the 2018-2019 academic year, an eligible student enrolled in a
registered apprenticeship program or, for the academic year beginning July 1,
2020, an eligible student enrolled in a qualified workforce training program
or, for the academic year beginning July 1, 2023, an eligible student enrolled
in a qualified proprietary school program, an approved workforce solutions
training program, or an eligible college of art and design, may receive
reimbursement of tuition, books, required tools, and other approved expenses
required for participation in the program, upon certification by the sponsor,
school, or college and approval by the authority.
(b) The reimbursement amount an eligible student may receive in an academic
Page 8 of 9
XXXX 1/3/2025 8:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 848
year shall not exceed the student's KEES award maximum.
(c) The total reimbursement amount an eligible student may receive under this
section shall not exceed the student's KEES award maximum multiplied by
four (4).
(4) Eligibility for a KEES scholarship under this section shall terminate upon the earlier
of:
(a) The expiration of eight (8)[five (5)] years following the eligible student's
graduation from high school or receiving a High School Equivalency
Diploma, except as provided in KRS 164.7881(5); or
(b) The eligible student's successful completion of the registered apprenticeship
program, qualified workforce training program, qualified proprietary school
program, or approved workforce solutions training program.
(5) The authority shall promulgate administrative regulations establishing the
procedures for making awards under this section in consultation with the Kentucky
Education and Labor Cabinet and the Kentucky Economic Development Cabinet.
Page 9 of 9
XXXX 1/3/2025 8:57 AM Jacketed